Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1426
Postsecondary education system and institution; report.

Each public postsecondary education system and institution shall report information as required by the commission pursuant to sections 85-1421 to 85-1427.

Laws 1978, LB 897, § 9;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 111;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 85-976;

Laws 1994, LB 683, § 30.